Utah statutes.
11-13-211.   Public agencies authorized to provide resources to administrative joint boards or interlocal entity.

A public agency entering into an agreement under this chapter under which an administrative joint board is established or an interlocal entity is created to operate the joint or cooperative undertaking may:

(1)  appropriate funds to the administrative joint board or interlocal entity;

(2)  sell, lease, give, or otherwise supply tangible and intangible property to the administrative joint board or interlocal entity; and

(3)  provide personnel or services for the administrative joint board or interlocal entity as may be within its legal power to furnish.

